New York, session 2025-2026, S326.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 365-q to read as follows: 3 § 365-q. Reimbursement of private duty nursing services and care. 4 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, rates of payment 5 for care and services furnished by a private duty nurse that would 6 otherwise qualify for reimbursement pursuant to this title shall be 7 increased by an amount not to exceed fifteen million dollars in the 8 aggregate for the period July first, two thousand twenty-six to March 9 thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, and twenty million dollars 10 annually thereafter for each period of April first to March thirty- 11 first. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00815-01-5